Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 8 Parentage by Gestational Carrier Agreement

15-8.1-801.
Eligibility to enter gestational carrier agreement.

In order to execute an agreement to act as a gestational carrier, an individual shall:

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Have completed a medical evaluation;

Have completed a mental health consultation by a licensed professional who is independent of the facility or providers that undertake the assisted reproduction procedures;

Have had independent legal representation of the individual’s own choosing, and paid for by the intended parent or parents regarding the terms of the gestational carrier agreement, and have been advised of the potential legal consequences of the gestational carrier agreement; and

Not have contributed gametes that will ultimately result in an embryo that the gestational carrier will attempt to carry to term, unless the gestational carrier is entering into an agreement with a family member.

Prior to executing a gestational carrier agreement, an individual or individuals intending to become a parent or parents, whether genetically related to the child or not, shall:

Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Have completed a medical evaluation and a mental health consultation; and

Have retained independent legal representation regarding the terms of the gestational carrier agreement and have been advised of the potential legal consequences of the gestational carrier agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-802.
Gestational carrier agreement.

A prospective gestational carrier, that individual’s spouse, if any, and the intended parent or parents may enter into a written agreement that:

The prospective gestational carrier agrees to pregnancy by means of assisted reproduction;

The prospective gestational carrier and that individual’s spouse, if any, have no rights and duties as the parents of a child conceived through assisted reproduction; and

The intended parent or parents will be the parents of any resulting child.

A gestational carrier agreement is enforceable only if it meets the following requirements:

The agreement shall be in writing and signed by all parties;

The agreement shall not require more than a one-year term to achieve pregnancy; and

At least one of the intended parents shall be a resident of the United States.

The agreement shall be executed before the commencement of any medical procedures, other than the medical evaluations required by §

15-8.1-801

and, in every instance, before transfer of embryos or gametes.

The gestational carrier and the intended parent or parents shall meet the eligibility requirements of §

15-8.1-801

.

If any party is married, the party’s spouse shall be a party to the agreement.

The gestational carrier and the intended parent or parents shall be represented by independent legal counsel in all matters concerning the agreement and each counsel shall affirmatively so state in a written declaration attached to the agreement. The declarations shall state that the agreement meets the requirements of this chapter and shall be solely relied upon by health care providers and staff at the time of birth and by the department of health for birth registration and certification purposes in the absence of a court order to the contrary.

The parties to the agreement shall sign a written acknowledgment of having received a copy of the agreement.

The signing of the agreement shall be witnessed and signed by at least one other individual.

The agreement shall expressly provide that the gestational carrier:

Shall undergo assisted reproduction and attempt to carry and give birth to any resulting child;

Has no claim to parentage of any resulting children and all rights of parentage shall vest in the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the children, regardless of whether a court order has been issued at the time of birth; and

Shall acknowledge the exclusive parentage of the intended parent or parents of all resulting children.

If the gestational carrier is married, the carrier’s spouse:

Shall acknowledge and agree to abide by the obligations imposed on the gestational carrier by the terms of the gestational carrier agreement;

Has no claim to parentage of any resulting children and all rights of parentage shall vest in the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the children, regardless of whether a court order has been issued at the time of birth; and

Shall acknowledge the exclusive parentage of the intended parent or parents of all resulting children.

The gestational carrier shall have the right to use the services of a health care provider or providers of the gestational carrier’s choosing to provide care during the pregnancy.

The agreement should provide for the disposition of embryos, if any, in the event of termination of the agreement, the death of an intended parent or parents, or of the divorce of the intended parents before transfer or implantation.

The intended parent or parents shall:

Be the exclusive parent or parents and accept parental rights and responsibilities of all resulting children immediately upon birth regardless of the number, gender, or mental or physical condition of the child or children; and

Assume responsibility for the financial support of all resulting children immediately upon the birth of the children.

Except as provided in §

15-8.1-809

, a gestational carrier agreement may include provisions for payment of consideration and reasonable expenses to a prospective gestational carrier, provided they are negotiated in good faith between the parties.

A gestational carrier agreement shall permit the individual acting as a gestational carrier to make all health and welfare decisions regarding the gestational carrier’s health and pregnancy, including, but not limited to, whether to consent to a caesarean section or multiple embryo transfer, and shall not enlarge or diminish the gestational carrier’s right to terminate the pregnancy. Except as otherwise provided by law, any written or verbal agreement purporting to waive or limit these rights is void as against public policy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-803.
Parental rights and responsibilities.

If a gestational carrier agreement satisfies the requirements of this article, the intended parent or parents are the parent or parents of the resulting child and parental rights and responsibilities shall vest exclusively in the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the child, and the resulting child is considered the child of the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the child. Neither the gestational carrier nor the gestational carrier’s spouse, if any, is the parent of the resulting child.

An individual who is determined to be a parent of the resulting child is obligated to support the child. The breach of the gestational carrier agreement by the intended parent or parents does not relieve the intended parent or parents of the obligation to support the resulting child.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section, if genetic testing indicates a genetic relationship between the gestational carrier and the child and the child was not conceived pursuant to a gestational carrier agreement with a family member, then parentage shall be determined by the family court pursuant to articles 1 through 6 of this chapter.

If, due to a laboratory or clinical error, the resulting child is not genetically related to either the intended parent or parents or any donor who donated to the intended parent or parents, the intended parent or parents are considered the parent or parents of the child and not the gestational carrier and the carrier’s spouse, if any, subject to any other claim of parentage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-804.
Birth orders.

Before the birth of a resulting child, a party to a gestational carrier agreement may commence a proceeding in the family court or the superior court to obtain a birth order declaring the parentage of a child. After the birth of a resulting child, the family court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over a birth order.

The birth order shall:

Declare that at least one of the intended parents is a United States resident;

Declare that the intended parent or parents are the parent or parents of the resulting child and that parental rights and responsibilities vest exclusively in the intended parent or parents immediately upon the birth of the child;

Designate the contents of the birth certificate and direct the department of health to designate the intended parent or parents as the parent or parents of the child. The department of health may charge a reasonable fee for the issuance of a birth certificate;

Seal the record from the public to protect the privacy of the child and the parents; and

Provide any relief the court determines necessary and proper.

Neither the state nor the department of health is a necessary party to a proceeding under subsection (a) of this section. Any party to the gestational carrier agreement not joining in the complaint must be served with notice of the proceeding.

A complaint for an order of parentage under this section must be verified and include the following:

A certification from the attorney representing the intended parent or parents and the attorney representing the person acting as a gestational carrier that the requirements of §§

15-8.1-801

and

15-8.1-802

have been met; and

A statement from all parties to the gestational carrier agreement that they entered into the agreement knowingly and voluntarily.

Where the court finds that the requirements of §§

15-8.1-801

and

15-8.1-802

have been satisfied, the order of parentage will include the following:

Declaring, that upon the birth of the child born during the term of the gestational carrier agreement, the intended parent or parents is/are the legal parent or parents of the child;

Declaring, that upon birth of the child born during the term of the gestational carrier agreement, the individual acting as the gestational carrier, and the spouse of the individual acting as the gestational carrier, if any, is not the legal parent of the child;

Ordering the individual acting as a gestational carrier and the spouse of the individual acting as a gestational carrier, if any, to transfer the child to the intended parent or parents if this has not already occurred;

Ordering the intended parent or parents to assume responsibility for the maintenance and support of the child immediately upon the birth of the child if this has not already occurred; and

Designating the contents of the birth certificate and directing the department of health to designate the intended parent or parents as the parent or parents of the child.

The court shall forward a certified copy of the order issued pursuant to this section to the department of health and the intended parents or their representative.

The intended parent or parents and any resulting child shall have access to their court records at any time.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-805.
Jurisdiction.

Subject to the jurisdictional standards of chapter 10 of title 8, the court conducting a proceeding under this chapter has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction of all matters arising out of the gestational carrier agreement until a child born to the gestational carrier during the period governed by the agreement attains the age of one hundred eighty (180) days.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-806.
Termination of gestational carrier agreement.

A party to a gestational carrier agreement may withdraw consent to any medical procedure and may terminate the gestational carrier agreement at any time prior to any embryo transfer or implantation by giving written notice of termination to all other parties.

Upon termination of the gestational carrier agreement under subsection (a) of this section, and unless a gestational carrier agreement provides otherwise, the gestational carrier is entitled to keep all payments received and obtain all payments to which the gestational carrier is entitled through the date of termination. Except in a case involving fraud, neither a prospective gestational carrier nor the gestational carrier’s spouse, if any, is liable to the intended parent or parents for terminating a gestational carrier agreement under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-807.
Effect of subsequent change of marital status.

Unless a gestational carrier agreement expressly provides otherwise:

The marriage of a gestational carrier or of an intended parent after the agreement has been signed by all parties does not affect the validity of the agreement, the gestational carrier’s spouse’s consent or intended parent’s spouse’s consent to the agreement is not required, and the gestational carrier’s spouse or intended parent’s spouse is not a presumed parent of a child conceived by assisted reproduction under the agreement; and

The divorce, dissolution, annulment, or legal separation of the gestational carrier or of an intended parent after the agreement has been signed by all parties does not affect the validity of the agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-808.
Effect of noncompliance, standard of review, remedies.

A gestational carrier agreement that does not substantially comply with the requirements of this article is not enforceable.

In the event that a gestational carrier agreement does not substantially comply with the requirements of this article, the family court or the superior court shall determine parentage based on the intent of the parties, including evidence of the intent of the parties at the time of execution.

Except as expressly provided in a gestational carrier agreement and in subsection (d) of this section, in the event of a breach of the gestational carrier agreement by the gestational carrier or the intended parent or parents, the gestational carrier or the intended parent or parents are entitled to all remedies available at law or in equity.

If an individual alleges that the parentage of a child born to a gestational carrier is not the result of assisted reproduction, and this question is relevant to the determination of parentage, the court may order genetic testing.

Specific performance is not an available remedy for a breach by the gestational carrier of any term in a gestational carrier agreement that requires the gestational carrier to be impregnated or to terminate a pregnancy. Specific performance is an available remedy for a breach by the gestational carrier of any term that prevents the intended parent or parents from exercising the full rights of parentage immediately upon the birth of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-809.
Liability for payment of gestational carrier health care costs.

The intended parent or parents are liable for the health care costs of the gestational carrier that are not paid by insurance. As used in this section, “health care costs” means the expenses of all health care provided for assisted reproduction, prenatal care, labor, and delivery.

A gestational carrier agreement shall explicitly detail how the health care costs of the gestational carrier are paid. The breach of a gestational carrier agreement by a party to the agreement does not relieve the intended parent or parents of the liability for health care costs imposed by subsection (a) of this section.

This section is not intended to supplant any health insurance coverage that is otherwise available to the gestational carrier or an intended parent for the coverage of health care costs. This section does not change the health insurance coverage of the gestational carrier or the responsibility of the insurance company to pay benefits under a policy that covers a gestational carrier.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.